Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [239.793] E-15 ACCESS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture. new text end new text begin (c) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture. new text end new text begin (d) "E-15" means gasoline containing 15 percent ethanol by volume. new text end new text begin (e) "Fuel station" means a location where a retailer offers for sale, sells, or dispenses gasoline. new text end new text begin (f) "Retailer" means a person who offers for sale, sells, or dispenses gasoline. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Existing retailers. new text end new text begin Beginning on August 1, 2030, a retailer with compatible infrastructure must advertise for sale and offer E-15 from at least one dispenser that must always be capable of dispensing gasoline while the dispenser is in operation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin New retailers. new text end new text begin Beginning on January 1, 2028, a retailer opening a new fuel station must offer E-15 from at least 50 percent of dispensers that must always be capable of dispensing gasoline while the dispensers are in operation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Suspension of E-15 requirements. new text end new text begin The commissioner must periodically determine the wholesale E-15 gasoline price and availability. The commissioner must report wholesale E-15 price differences and the availability of E-15 to the governor who, after consultation with the commissioner and commissioner of commerce, may adjust the E-15 requirements in this section by executive order if a price disparity reported by the commissioner causes economic hardship to retailers or if E-15 becomes unavailable. An adjustment must be made for a specified period of time. After the executive order expires, the requirements in this section apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Small retailer waiver. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may waive the requirement for a retailer to comply with this section if the retailer reports the fuel station has annual sales that do not exceed $300,000. new text end new text begin (b) A retailer may apply for a small retailer waiver order by submitting an application to the department in a manner and according to procedures required by the department. new text end new text begin (c) The retailer's application must be supported by credible evidence that the retailer's fuel station had sales that did not exceed $300,000 during the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the request for the waiver is made. The retailer must sign the application, which must include a statement that the retailer swears and affirms that the information in the application is true and correct. new text end new text begin (d) Upon request by the commissioner, the commissioner of revenue must certify the average total gasoline gallonage for the retailer's fuel station for a specified determination period. The total gasoline gallonage must be based on site-specific information for the retailer's fuel station as reported by the retailer in required reports submitted to the Department of Revenue. If the Department of Revenue is unable to determine site-specific information for the retailer's fuel station from the reports, the Department of Revenue may use other methods to calculate the total gasoline gallonage for the fuel station. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding any other law classifying the data as nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 8a, the commissioner of revenue must share data classified as nonpublic data with the department upon a request submitted under paragraph (d). The information maintained by the department under this section is nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9, and must be used by the department only to: (1) evaluate the retail dealer's application for waiver approval; and (2) issue a waiver order under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (f) The Department of Revenue and the department may adopt rules to administer this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Incompatible infrastructure waiver. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may issue an administrative order that waives the requirements for a retailer to comply with this section if: new text end new text begin (1) the retailer's fuel station has gasoline tanks in use that were installed prior to 1985; new text end new text begin (2) the retailer's fuel station has gasoline tanks in use constructed with double-wall fiberglass prior to 1991; new text end new text begin (3) the retailer's fuel station has gasoline tanks in use constructed with single-wall fiberglass prior to 1996; or new text end new text begin (4) the retailer's fuel stations require upgrades that exceed $100,000 to make the fuel station infrastructure compatible to sell E-15. new text end new text begin (b) A retailer may apply for an incompatible infrastructure waiver order by submitting an application to the department in a manner and according to procedures required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) The retailer's application must be supported by credible evidence that the retailer is unable to comply with this section because the gasoline storage infrastructure located at the retailer's fuel station is incompatible with this section. new text end new text begin (d) The application must require the retailer to provide information, including an inventory and description of gasoline storage infrastructure located at the retailer's fuel station. The retailer must sign the application, including a statement that the retailer swears and affirms that the information in the application is true and correct. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner may require the retailer to attach supporting documentation to the application, including an inspection report completed by a person certified by the department as a professional retail motor fuel site installer. The commissioner may inspect the premises of a fuel station during normal business hours to administer and enforce this section. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner must review and evaluate an application to determine whether the application is supported by credible evidence sufficient for the commissioner to issue an order granting a waiver under this section. The commissioner must approve or disapprove a completed application within 120 days after the date the application was delivered to the department for filing. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Terminable events. new text end new text begin The commissioner must terminate waiver orders issued under this section if a terminable event occurs. A terminable event occurs on the date: new text end new text begin (1) the retailer ceases to engage in the business of advertising for sale or selling gasoline at the retailer's fuel station; or new text end new text begin (2) a gasoline tank located at the fuel station is installed, replaced, or converted. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Waiver order publication. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish a copy of a waiver order issued under this section on the department's website within ten days after the date the order was issued. The order is effective on the date the order is published, unless the order specifies a later effective date. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end